California statutes. Education Code
Not to exceed two hundred fifty million dollars ($250,000,000) of the proceeds of the sale of bonds authorized by the School Building Aid and Earthquake Reconstruction and Replacement Bond Law of 1972 may be expended pursuant to this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16312.

The Legislature hereby declares that it is in the interest of the state and the people thereof to provide assistance to school districts in rehabilitating or replacing structurally unsafe school facilities inasmuch as the education of children is an obligation of the state, and the obligation carries with it a corresponding responsibility for the physical safety of children while attending school.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16313.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to provide a means through repayable state loans for school districts not otherwise eligible for assistance under this chapter (consisting principally of school districts in the urban centers of the state), to house their pupils in facilities that are structurally safe.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16314.

The following terms, as used in this article, shall have the following meanings, unless the State Allocation Board finds a different meaning is essential for properly carrying out the purposes of this article, or finds that a different meaning clearly appears from the context:

(a) “Board” means the State Allocation Board as defined in Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000) of this chapter.

(b) “Director” means the Director of
 Education.

(c) “District” means an elementary, high school, or unified school district.

(d) “Project” means the purposes for which a district has applied for assistance in the rehabilitation or replacement of unsafe school facilities at a given attendance center.

(e) “Apportionment” means an apportionment made under this article, and unless the context otherwise requires, it shall be deemed to include funds of a district required by the board to be contributed toward the cost of a project.

(f) “Attendance center” means a school maintained or to be maintained at a given location within a district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16315.

The State Allocation Board shall administer this article. The Director of General Services shall provide the assistance to the board as it may require.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16316.

In addition to any other powers and duties granted to the board by Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000) of this chapter, the board shall:

(a) Establish the qualifications that it deems will best serve the purposes of this article for determining the eligibility of districts to apportionments under this article.

(b) Establish the procedures and policies in connection with the administration of and expenditure of funds made available
 for the purpose of this article that it deems necessary.

(c) Adopt the rules and regulations for the administration of this article, requiring the procedure, forms, and information as it may deem necessary.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16317.

The board, by the adoption of rules, shall give priority in allocating funds to districts which will benefit most from the reconstruction or replacement of schoolhouse facilities. This priority may be based on the age and structural safety of existing buildings at the school or schools where the construction or reconstruction will occur, acuteness of overcrowding and density of population in the attendance areas affected, or any other factors that will insure that the greatest need will be served in allocating funds under this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16318.

The board shall prescribe instructions specifying the manner in which property, real or personal, being replaced through the apportionment, shall be disposed of, and compliance with the instructions shall be a condition upon the making of the apportionment. The net proceeds derived from the disposition shall be contributed in reduction of any apportionment proportionate to the state’s participating in the project. Any school district affected shall comply with instructions prescribed by the board. The board may require a district to transfer to the state by any
 instruments deemed appropriate by the board, title to the property, whereupon, the board shall dispose of the property in any manner it deems appropriate to insure the highest return to the state, and apply the applicable proceeds therefrom in reduction of apportionments to the district. The district affected shall do all things deemed necessary by the board to implement the disposition.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16319.

Apportionments under this article from the State School Building Aid Fund shall be made for the sole purpose of reconstructing or replacing existing substandard buildings that present a potential threat to the safety of schoolchildren and which do not comply with the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of Chapter 2 of Part 10.5 or for the purpose of restoring facilities damaged by an earthquake after February 1, 1971, and for which there are no other state or federal funds available for the restoration. The apportionments shall be made in the
 manner and subject to the conditions herein provided and in accordance with policies adopted by the board for the following purposes, all of which purposes are declared to be, and are, public works:

(a) The reconstruction, renovation, or remodeling of existing school buildings and facilities.

(b) The construction of permanent or temporary school buildings and facilities for replacement purposes.

(c) The acquisition, by purchase or lease, and the installation of classrooms for replacement purposes.

(d) The acquisition and development of schoolsites necessary for construction of buildings approved under this article.

(e) The construction, repair, attachment, or development of offsite
 facilities, utilities or improvements which the board determines are necessary to the proper operation or functioning of the school facilities for which apportionments are made.

(f) The acquisition of additional furniture and equipment as is deemed necessary by the board to make the rehabilitated or replaced facilities properly function.

(g) Any combination of the above.

Except as is provided in Section 16320, apportionments shall not be made under this article for the purpose of reconstructing or replacing existing substandard buildings which have already been reconstructed or replaced using funds made available under Chapter 1575 of the Statutes of 1947, as amended, or Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 16500), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 15700), and Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 16000) of this part.

As a part of the purposes, where a district is required by a contract entered into between itself and a contractor, to obtain at its own expense insurance covering risks incurred during any construction, reconstruction, or alteration for which an apportionment has been made, the cost thereof may be paid either directly, or by way of reimbursement, to the district out of the apportionment, or out of any apportionment made specifically covering the insurance. However, in other respects the apportionments are eligible for payment under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16320.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 16319, apportionments under this article from the proceeds of bonds remaining from the authorization provided in the State School Building Aid Bond Law of 1966 may be made for the purpose of (1) reconstructing or replacing existing substandard school buildings or high school dormitories that present a potential threat to the safety of schoolchildren and which were not previously constructed or reconstructed in accordance with the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 17280) of Chapter 2 of Part 10.5 or which if
 previously reconstructed to comply with the provisions of Article 3 no longer meet the standards of structural safety prescribed under the authority of Article 3 in effect on April 10, 1933, or (2) reconstructing or replacing existing structures utilized by a school district as school buildings originally designed to house the United States Cavalry and used as World War II prisoner-of-war camp structures or an existing structure utilized by a school district as a school building which was originally designed as a mess facility for the United States Army Air Corps without regard to conditional or provisional structural approvals received by the district with respect to the buildings prior to the enactment of Chapter 500 of the Statutes of 1972.

Apportionments for the reconstruction or replacement of a dormitory shall only be made when the use and occupancy of the dormitory will be by resident pupils of the district who are in attendance at the high school of the
 district and when in the judgment of the board the pupils cannot be reasonably expected to travel by vehicle to the school on a daily basis.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16321.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 16319, apportionments under this article from the proceeds of bonds remaining from the authorization provided in the State School Building Aid Bond Law of 1966 may be made for the purpose of replacing school buildings severely damaged by an earthquake in Sonoma County subsequent to September 30, 1969, and subsequently demolished by the school district in the interest of safety to the children, but not yet replaced by permanent facilities.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16321.7.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 16319, apportionments may be made to a school district for the purpose of replacing an existing substandard building which formerly housed the district’s high school, and which was subsequently replaced by a new high school building using an apportionment received under this chapter, but which continued to be used by the district for elementary school purposes from the time of completion of the new high school in the 1958–59 school year until November 1971, when the pupils were transferred from the unsafe school building to
 temporary structures.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16322.

The State Department of Education shall provide the following services to school districts making applications for apportionments under this article:

(a) It shall assist school districts in organizing a comprehensive planning effort. It shall guide a planning process through its appropriate steps and, when requested by a school district, it shall provide the school district with sources of expertise, either public or private, which may be able to contribute to the development of plans to find solutions
 for specific problems a school district may have.

(b) It shall provide continuing research in relation to all phases of educational programs and the school facilities that are required to implement these educational programs.

(c) It shall provide a review and evaluation service to school districts to assure the effectiveness of the facilities that have been provided in accommodating educational programs.

(d) It shall provide communication media through publications and seminars, and prepare planning guides and procedures containing recommendations, which guides shall be used to disseminate educational planning information to all school districts.

Unless specifically exempted by the State Allocation Board, each school district which files an application for an apportionment
 of funds under this article after July 1, 1973, shall prepare and submit to the board either, (1) a long-range comprehensive master plan justifying the application, prepared in accordance with acceptable planning procedures, or (2) a certification to the effect that replacement school buildings for which application has been made will all be located on existing schoolsites containing a school building or buildings, or (3) a certification that the applicant school maintains only one school. Specific information relating to the following factors must be included in the master plan:

(a) A statement of the educational programs and goals of the district in relation to its programs, both current and future.

(b) A comprehensive evaluation and report of the utilization of the school facilities now existing in the district together with preliminary plans of the facilities to be
 reconstructed or replaced under this article, prepared in accordance with the requirements of Section 17302 or 81138.

(c) A comprehensive demographic study of the district, as it currently exists and as projected into the future.

(d) A policy statement regarding actual or potential human problems.

(e) A policy statement as to the priority in which the district proposes to solve its school housing problems.

(f) A policy statement regarding cooperation with other local public agencies to achieve total community development.

(g) A policy to insure continuous review so that plans will be kept up to date and changing conditions will be reviewed and accommodated by appropriate revision of
 plans.

The director shall review the long-range master plan and project development plan and shall report his findings and recommendations thereon to the board. The board shall in no instance approve an application or make an apportionment therefor until it has determined to its satisfaction that the facility for which the apportionment is sought is justified by an appropriate estimate of average daily attendance and location within the district.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16323.

Each school district which desires an apportionment shall submit through its governing board to the board an application therefor in the form and number of copies as the board shall prescribe. Each copy of the application shall be accompanied by a statement of the estimated cost of the project certified by an architect or structural engineer, and by layout plans showing the entire construction project for which the district desires an apportionment.

Estimates of costs for new construction or equipment appearing in an
 application shall conform to cost standards adopted by the board under Section 16024.

A school district shall not let any contract for new construction included in an application for a construction project which has been approved by the board if the cost exceeds the construction cost standards fixed by the board under Section 16024 for the new construction by more than 2 percent or except as otherwise provided in Section 16332. The amount, if any, by which the contract cost exceeds the construction cost standards fixed by the board shall be borne by the school district and shall not be included in the apportionment.

A school district may at any time amend or supplement its application.

Each construction project for which a district applies for an apportionment shall be applied for on a separate application and shall be considered separately by the board. If a district applies for
 more than one construction project, at the same time or at different times, the priority points of the district shall be recalculated after the approval of each separate construction project and before a subsequent construction project is approved.

The board shall require any changes in the plans which an applicant school district submits with its application that the board determines is necessary or desirable to reduce the cost of the project.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16324.

A school district may at any time file an application or amend or supplement an application. Upon receipt of any application, the Director of General Services shall as promptly as possible prepare a report and recommendation with respect to the application after having received recommendations from the director in respect to any matter which is subject to the jurisdiction or approval of the director or State Department of Education. The board shall, subject to the provisions of this article, approve, in whole or in part, or reject each application referred to it by
 the Director of General Services. If the board approves of the application, either in whole or in part, it shall, by a resolution adopted by it, apportion to the district from the State School Building Aid Fund the amount applied for, or any portion thereof that the board may determine appropriate. However, it may order that the apportionment or any part thereof shall be paid in progressive installments at any times and under any conditions that it may then prescribe. This shall be known as a conditional apportionment and shall become final only if the vote provided for in Section 16327 is favorable and if the county superintendent of schools furnishes a certificate satisfactory to the board certifying that there is on deposit in the state school building fund of the district the amount of district funds which, when added to the apportionment computed under Section 16330, will equal the estimated cost of the project approved under Section 16323.

Unless the board has
 received the certificates of the county superintendent of schools required by this section within nine months from the date of the conditional apportionment, it shall, at the expiration of the nine-month period, void the conditional apportionment and shall certify this fact to the Controller. Each final apportionment made by the board under this article, shall be certified by it to the Controller who shall from time to time draw his or her warrant on the Treasurer in favor of the county treasurer of the county having jurisdiction over the district in accordance with the terms of the final apportionment. The warrant shall be exempt from the provisions of Division 4 (commencing with Section 16100) of Title 2 of the Government Code and shall be paid by the Treasurer from the State School Building Aid Fund.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16325.

The board may, upon approval of the application, in whole or in part, and subsequently from time to time, make a conditional apportionment or conditional apportionments not exceeding in the aggregate the total amount approved for the application from the State School Building Aid Fund for such portion or portions of the project for which the board determines the district is ready to proceed. If the board has approved an application and made an apportionment as to a portion or portions of a project, the board may approve the remaining portion or portions of the
 project and make an additional apportionment or apportionments as it deems appropriate.

If the board determines that the actual cost is in excess of the estimated cost of the specific school plant facilities or sites for which an apportionment to a district has been made, or for which a district’s application has been approved in whole or in part pursuant to this section, the board may make an additional apportionment to any district in an amount equal to the excess even though the additional apportionment will result in the total apportionments to the district exceeding the amount of the application originally approved by the board.

Approval of an application under this section shall not be construed as creating or implying any obligation, commitment or promise on the part of the board or the state to make apportionments under this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16326.

The amount of new building area for which an apportionment may be made for the purpose of replacing unsafe school buildings shall be computed in accordance with regulations adopted by the board. Such regulation shall be based upon the number of units of average daily attendance which were housed in the unsafe buildings being replaced and the building area limitations contained in Sections 16047, 16052, 16053, 16054 and 16055 together with any adjustments necessary to alleviate hardships occurring as a result of only partial replacement of an entire attendance center.
 In no event shall an apportionment be made for new building area the chargeable area of which exceeds the chargeable area of the unsafe buildings being replaced. The chargeable area of any school building shall be computed in the uniform manner prescribed by the board.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16327.

No payment of funds may be made pursuant to an apportionment unless the district holds an election at which the electorate of the district approve the acceptance, expenditure, and repayment of at least the amount apportioned pursuant to this article. The election may be held prior to or subsequent to an apportionment. If the electors voting at the election fail to approve the proposition by the same majority required at a district bond election, within nine months from the date of the apportionment, the apportionment and the board’s approval of the application become
 null and void.

Notwithstanding the foregoing, an election held prior to the effective date of Article 9 (commencing with Section 16310) of this chapter, pursuant to Section 16058, is valid for the purposes of the foregoing paragraph, provided that the district is not otherwise eligible to receive apportionments under Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000), Article 2 (commencing with Section 16150), and Article 3 (commencing with Section 16190) of this chapter.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16328.

No apportionment shall be made to a district for the construction, reconstruction, or alteration of, or addition to, school buildings if the requirements prescribed by this code for the construction of school buildings are not met by the plans for the entire building program of the district in connection with which the district applied for an apportionment.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16329.

Payment shall be made in accordance with the terms of an apportionment, either directly or by way of reimbursement, to a school district for expenditures, or commitments therefor, which have been made by the district subsequent to the effective date of this article for any items approved by the board in such apportionment. However, where expenditures were made for, or work was commenced with respect to, any item so approved, prior to the time the application of the district containing the item was received by the board, payment or reimbursement for the item, either
 with state funds or with district funds which the district is required to contribute by the apportionment, shall be made only upon authorization of the board by special resolution citing this section.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16330.

The amount of the apportionment to a school district from the State School Building Aid Fund shall initially be computed by the board as follows:

(a) Determining the ratio which the school district’s assessed valuation per pupil for the grade level of the project application bears to the statewide assessed valuation per pupil in that grade level, for the preceding fiscal year.

(b) Subtracting the amount computed under (a) from four.

(c) Dividing the amount computed under (b) by four plus the ratio which the school district’s assessed valuation per pupil for the grade level of the project application bears to the statewide assessed valuation per pupil for that grade level, for the preceding fiscal year, which computation shall be denoted the “basic computed state matching ratio of assistance.”

(d) The computation prescribed by subdivisions (a), (b), and (c) may be diagrammed as follows, with “A.V.” representing the words “assessed valuation,” and “a.d.a.” representing the words “average daily attendance.”District A.V. per a.d.a.Basic computed4 -Statewide A.V. per a.d.a.state matching=District A.V. per a.d.a.ratio of assistance4 +Statewide A.V. per a.d.a.(e) The basic computed state matching ratio of assistance for a grade level of a school district shall not be less than 25 percent nor more than 80 percent of the cost of any specific project.

(f) When the final eligible costs of a project have been determined pursuant to the audit prescribed in Sections 16340 and 16099, the amount of the basic computed state matching ratio of assistance to the district shall be adjusted
 accordingly.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16330.5.

Notwithstanding former Section 39230, as amended by Section 147 of Chapter 36 of the Statutes of 1977, or anything to the contrary in this article, whenever the State Allocation Board determines that state funds are not available to make an apportionment for an otherwise eligible project in the amount computed pursuant to Section 16330, an application may be approved and an apportionment made for one dollar ($1) only. In any instances the project may be financed by the applicant district using funds derived from a twenty-cent ($0.20) tax levy provided by Section
 39230, as amended by Section 147 of Chapter 36 of the Statutes of 1977, together with any other funds available to the district for those purposes. The tax levy shall be twenty cents ($0.20) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed value for years prior to the 1980-81 fiscal year and beginning in the 1981–82 fiscal year shall be 0.05 percent of the full value.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16331.

A school district may obtain local funds to match the state assistance with any combination of funds available as follows:

(a) Through the issuance of school district bonds.

(b) Through the levy and collection of school district taxes. The proceeds of any increase in the maximum tax rate shall be used exclusively for projects for which an apportionment or apportionments have been made under this article.

(c) Through the levy and collection of school district taxes as authorized by Section 39230.

(d) From any other fund available for capital outlay purposes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16332.

Whenever a school district determines that it is in its best interest to provide facilities on a given schoolsite in addition to those contained in the approved application, it may do so, with any excess funds it has available for capital outlay purposes, beyond those required under this article, by adding the excess funds to the total cost of the project. There shall be no penalties imposed under this article as a result of the expenditures.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16333.

Whenever a school district has received an apportionment or apportionments of funds pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 15700) or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 16000) of this part, and, through the issuance of bonds, uses the bond proceeds as its source of funds to match its share of the eligible project cost of any project for which an apportionment of funds is made under this article, the amount of the bond funds shall be considered eligible bonded debt service in the computations made by the Director of General Services prescribed in Sections 15729
 and 15730 and in Sections 16070 to 16090, inclusive.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16334.

The interest on apportionments made under this article shall be established by the board, with the approval of the Director of General Services, as follows:

(1) The interest rate applicable to apportionments made pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 16000) and determined in accordance with Section 16065 shall be established as of June 30 of each year.

(2) The applicable interest rate on June 30 shall apply to apportionments made
 under this article in the ensuing fiscal year, July 1 through June 30.

(3) Interest on the apportionment shall be compounded annually through the 30th day of June of each year.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16335.

Each district to which an apportionment or apportionments has been made under this article shall repay the principal amount of such apportionment or apportionments and the accrued interest thereon in 20 equal annual payments. The first payment shall be made in the second fiscal year following the year in which the apportionment is made. In any year prior to the 1980–81 fiscal year in which the equal annual repayment exceeds that amount which seventeen and one-half cents ($0.175) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation for each grade level (i.e.
 elementary or high school) operated by the district would raise during the year of the computation, the repayment shall be reduced to the amount which the seventeen and one-half cents ($0.175) for each grade level would so raise. In any year, beginning in the 1981–82 fiscal year, in which the equal annual repayment exceeds that amount which 0.04375 percent of the full value for each grade level operated by the district would raise during the year of the computation, the repayment shall be reduced to the amount which the 0.04375 percent of the full value for each grade level would so raise. The amount of the reduction in computed repayment shall be canceled on the books of the Controller. If more than one apportionment is made the annual amount payable shall be the sum of the amounts which would be payable on each amount if computed separately.

On or before the first day of January of each fiscal year the State Controller shall determine the annual repayment, if any,
 to be due from each district during the next succeeding fiscal year. The computation and collection procedures shall be in accordance with Sections 16080, 16089, and 16090.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16335.1.

Any apportionment made to the Marysville Joint Unified School District under Section 16339.8 shall be repaid through the continuance of the seventeen and one-half cents ($0.175) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation per grade level tax rate set forth in Section 16335, after such time as the maximum repayment under Section 16335 becomes less than seventeen and one-half cents ($0.175) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed
 valuation per grade level. When the Controller has determined that the entire apportionment including interest, but less any amount paid by the district pursuant to Section 16339.8 has been completely repaid, this section shall cease to be operative.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.   Inoperative on date prescribed its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

16336.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this article, any school district which has levied the entire amount permitted under former Section 39230, as amended by Section 147 of Chapter 36 of the Statutes of 1977, and has declared the entire proceeds therefrom available as local matching funds for a particular project, but lacks sufficient matching funds for the project as required under this article, may file an application thereunder prior to January 1, 1974. Under the circumstances the board may increase the basic computed state matching ratio of assistance in the amount,
 which, when added to the sum of the entire proceeds of the levy permitted under former Section 39230, as amended by Section 147 of Chapter 36 of the Statutes of 1997, and any other funds which in the opinion of the board is or can be made currently available for the project, including funds authorized by the electors from bonds or otherwise, would be necessary to construct minimum essential facilities for the project as determined by the board. Not more than forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) available for the purposes of this article may be apportioned for increases in the basic computed state matching ratio pursuant to this section. The source of the forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) apportioned for this purpose shall be thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) previously appropriated for this purpose from the School Building Safety Fund by Chapter 500 of the Statutes of 1972, plus an additional fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) of bond funds remaining from the State School Building Aid Bond
 Law of 1966.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16337.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this article, where less than thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) has been apportioned or otherwise reserved by the board pursuant to Section 16336 on January 1, 1973, the board shall apportion as grants the remainder thereof under this section for matching purposes pursuant to this article to districts which the board determines has the greatest need. The apportionments under this section may be made only to those districts (1) which would not have been eligible to apply under Section 16336 if they had levied the entire twenty cent
 ($0.20) tax rate specified therein, and (2) which have filed an application by January 1, 1973, and received an apportionment under this article from the board by February 28, 1973.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16339.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this article or Section 16336 thereof to the contrary, any school district which lacks sufficient matching funds for a particular project or projects, as required under this article, may file an application and the board may approve a project or projects conditioned upon the district levying, in the 1974–75 fiscal year, the entire twenty cent ($0.20) tax rate per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation permitted under former Section 39230, as amended by Section 147 of Chapter 36 of the Statutes of 1997, or Section 81180 and
 applying the proceeds of such levy as local matching funds for such project or projects. Beginning in the 1981–82 fiscal year, the tax shall be 0.05 percent of full value.

Under those circumstances, provided the applicant district was not eligible to receive a grant under Section 16337, the board may increase the basic computed state matching ratio of assistance in that amount, which, when added to the sum of the entire proceeds of the twenty cent ($0.20) tax rate, except beginning in the 1981–82 fiscal year, the tax shall be 0.05 percent of full value, and any other funds which in the opinion of the board are or can be made currently available for the project or projects, would be necessary to construct minimum essential facilities for the project or projects as determined by the board. Not more than nineteen million dollars ($19,000,000) of the proceeds of the sale of bonds authorized by Section 16310, may be apportioned pursuant to this section and in
 augmentation of the forty-five million dollars ($45,000,000) made available under Section 16336.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16339.5.

Notwithstanding any provisions of this article to the contrary, any district which does not have sufficient matching funds for a particular project as required under this article may file an application under Section 16339, and the board may approve the project conditioned upon the district levying in the 1975–76 fiscal year the entire twenty cent ($0.20) tax rate per one hundred dollars ($100) of the assessed valuation permitted under Section 39230.1 in lieu of the tax authorized by Section 16339 and applying the entire proceeds of the levy as local matching funds
 for the project providing:

(a) The district has levied a tax at the rate of at least ten cents ($0.10) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of the tax permitted under Section 39230 for the 1973–74 fiscal year and of at least nine cents ($0.09) per one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation of the tax permitted under Section 39230 for the 1974–75 fiscal year.

(b) The district has sold the facilities to be replaced to a county prior to June 1972, but continued to use the facilities after the sale until June 1972.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

16339.6.
